Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-956
Public lands; cost of control.

The cost of controlling noxious weeds on all land, including highways, roadways, streets, alleys, and rights-of-way, owned or controlled by a state department, agency, commission, or board or a political subdivision shall be paid by the state department, agency, commission, or board in control thereof or the political subdivision out of funds appropriated to the state department, agency, commission, or board or budgeted by the political subdivision for its use.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 5, p. 84;

Laws 1975, LB 14, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 8.